src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_11_rest
  +Sg          :                nom_end         ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA          ill_hVVn        ;

!Por
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG          gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                 par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^HMETA           ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                 ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG          sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG          nom_t           ;
! +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             gen_n           ; ! this in x_11
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             par_end         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl

!Jok
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^WG              gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                 par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^HMETA           ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                 ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^WG              sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG              nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          gen_tten        ;! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>j             par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ;

!Var
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^WG              gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                  par_A          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^HMETA           ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                 ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^WG              sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG              nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2          gen_tten        ;! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>j               par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ;


LEXICON n_11_dial

+N   :ku               x_11_dial ;
+N   :k2u              x_11_dial_JokVar ;

LEXICON x_11_dial 
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                 nom_end         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^WG              gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                 par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^HMETA           ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                 ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^WG              sgpl_cases_even_Por ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG              nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             gen_n           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             par_end         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^HMETA           ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even_Por ;

LEXICON x_11_dial_JokVar
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^WG              gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                 par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^WG              sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>j              par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^HMETA           ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ;


LEXICON n_11_AO !!= * @CODE@ sana - sanoissa. Linna? Linnoissa? aika
+N:         x_11_AO ;
!+N:         x_11_AO ;
!+N:         x_11_AO ; 


LEXICON x_11_AO !!= * @CODE@ sana - sanoissa. Linna? Linnoissa? aika ! TODO which adjectives?
+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por       par_V           ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG                 nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG                 nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             gen_n           ; ! gen_n         since we have the i
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             par_end         ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j              par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>j              par_A           ;
+Pl:^AO^HMETA                        ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; ! TO DO: meidän täytyy tehdä lopullisen päätöksen aika- ja aita- paradigmoista var ja jok murteissa

LEXICON n_11_AO_pl
+N             :       x_11_AO_pl ;
+N+Pl          :       nom_t      ; ! housut, kasvot

LEXICON x_11_AO_pl !!= * @CODE@ sanat

+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG                 nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG                 nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             gen_n           ; ! gen_n         since we have the i
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             par_end         ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j              par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>j              par_A           ;
+Pl:^AO^HMETA                        ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; ! TO DO: meidän täytyy tehdä lopullisen päätöksen aika- ja aita- paradigmoista var ja jok murteissa


LEXICON n_11_A0_A2I !!= * @CODE@ kuva - kuvissa, poika - pojissa ! TODO which adjectives?
+N+Dial/Por :^Por             x_11_A0_A2I ;
+N+Dial/Var :^Var             x_11_A0_A2I ;
+N+Dial/Jok :^Jok             x_11_A0_A2I ;

LEXICON x_11_A0_A2I !!= * @CODE@ kuva - kuvissa, poika - pojissa ! TODO which adjectives?
+Sg         :                 nom_R   ; ! miksi tämä? TODO
+Sg         :                 nom_end   ;
+Sg         :^WG              gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:                 par_V           ;
+Sg+Dial/Jok:                 par_A           ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:                 par_A           ;
+Sg         :^HMETA           ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg         :                 ess_nA          ;
+Sg         :^WG              sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

+Pl         :^WG              nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A2I%>i2         gen_n           ; ! gen_n         since we have the i
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
+Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A2I%>i2         par_end         ; ! for this and gen, add A2I to 0:v context
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       par_A           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       par_A           ;
+Pl         :^A0^HMETA        ill_hiin        ; ! kuvhiin
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2          ess_nA          ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       ess_nA          ; ! no a:o
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       ess_nA          ; ! no a:o
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2       sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; !TODO ^A0 so that i2 (plural) is consistent (not a:i here)
+Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; !TODO ^A0 so that i2 (plural) is consistent (not a:i here)
