src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
poikkipuusaha:poikki#puu#saha n_11_AO ;
kauha:kauha n_11_AO ;
paja:paja n_11_AO ;
daattapohja:daatta#pohja n_11_A0_A2I ;
kenkäpohja:kenkä#pohja n_11_A0_A2I ;
etusija:etu#sija n_11_AO ;
talja:talja n_11_AO ;
viljat:vilja n_11_AO_pl ;
kolja:kolja n_11_A0_A2I ;
luoja:luoja n_11_A0_A2I ;
pikkukarja:pikku#karja n_11_AO ;
fraasikirja:fraasi#kirja n_11_AO ;
käsikirja:käsi#kirja n_11_AO ;
pyytökuja:pyytökuja n_11_A0_A2I ;
ristipoika:risti#poi6ka n_11_A0_A2I ;
puunapoika:puuna#poi6ka n_11_A0_A2I ;
koulupoika:koulu#poi6ka n_11_A0_A2I ;
verinahka:veri#nahka n_11_AO ;
kellonaika:kellon#aika n_11_AO ;
vuođenaika:vuođen#aika n_11_AO ;
uuđestirakentamisaika:uuđestirakentamis#aika n_11_AO ;
vika:vika n_11_AO ;
työtaakka:työ#taakka n_11_AO ;
kalannousupaikka:kalan#nousu#paikka n_11_AO ;
markkinapaikka:markkina#paikka n_11_AO ;
rakenuspaikka:rakenus#paikka n_11_AO ;
välipaikka:väli#paikka n_11_AO ;
pääroikka:pää#roikka n_11_A0_A2I ;
skikka:skikka n_11_AO ;
fokka:fokka n_11_A0_A2I ;
ankka:ankka n_11_AO ;
könkänokka:könkä#nokka n_11_A0_A2I ;
tokka:tokka n_11_A0_A2I ;
myötäluokka:myötä#luokka n_11_A0_A2I ;
koirankaulanurkka:koirankaula#nurkka n_11_A0_A2I ;
meriraukka:meri#raukka n_11_A0_A2I ;
voikukka:voi#kukka n_11_A0_A2I ;
kesäkukka:kesä#kukka n_11_A0_A2I ;
kävelymukka:kävely#mukka n_11_A0_A2I ;
pitkäsukka:pitkä#sukka n_11_A0_A2I ;
elka:elk2a n_11_AO ;
lanka:lanka n_11_AO ;
honka:honka n_11_A0_A2I ;
tradisuuniruoka+Err/Orth:tradišuuni#ruoka n_11_A0_A2I ;
favoriittiruoka:favoriitti#ruoka n_11_A0_A2I ;
turvetsarka:turvet#sarka n_11_AO ;
kyrönniska:kyrön#niska n_11_AO ;
taaraturska:taara#turska n_11_A0_A2I ;
ruska:ruska n_11_A0_A2I ;
ylileuka:yli#leuka n_11_AO ;
karstiala:karsti#ala n_11_AO ;
kruuva-ala:kruuva-#ala n_11_A0_A2I ;
pohjaisala:pohjais#ala n_11_AO ;
tulvimaa-ala:tulvimaa-#ala n_11_AO ;
niskakala:niska#kala n_11_AO ;
valkkeekala:valkkee#kala n_11_AO ;
miila:miila n_11_AO ;
housusella:housu#sella n_11_AO ;
löysämassat:löysä#massa n_11_AO_pl ;
aurinkoprillat:aurinko#prilla n_11_AO_pl ;
prillat:prilla n_11_AO_pl ;
kihlat:kihla n_11_AO_pl ;
sellat:sella n_11_AO_pl ;
tuntokarvat:tunto#karva n_11_AO_pl ;
prillat+Err/Orth:brilla n_11_AO_pl ;
kamerarulla:kamera#rulla n_11_A0_A2I ;
luola:luola n_11_A0_A2I ;
keula:keula n_11_AO ;
myöntymäskeema:myöntymä#skeema n_11_AO ;
kantamavoima:kantama#voima n_11_A0_A2I ;
tarttumavoima:tarttuma#voima n_11_A0_A2I ;
hamheenhelma:hamheen#helma n_11_AO ;
milligramma:milli#gramma n_11_AO ;
kouluhomma:koulu#homma n_11_A0_A2I ;
summa:summa n_11_A0_A2I ;
pahtaloma:pahta#loma n_11_A0_A2I ;
tooma:tooma n_11_A0_A2I ;
jorma:jorma n_11_A0_A2I ;
tapaturma:tapa#turma n_11_A0_A2I ;
aikaplaana:aika#plaana n_11_AO ;
keskipaana:keski#paana n_11_AO ;
lainasana:laina#sana n_11_AO ;
alkusanat:alku#sana n_11_AO_pl ;
tervettyssanat:tervettys#sana n_11_AO_pl ;
vaina:vaina n_11_AO ;
tiekrinna:tie#krinna n_11_AO ;
kuona:kuona n_11_A0_A2I ;
ruuna:ruuna n_11_A0_A2I ;
aapa:aapa n_11_AO ;
kampa:kampa n_11_AO ;
kukkatolppa:kukka#tolppa n_11_A0_A2I ;
kroppa:kroppa n_11_A0_A2I ;
maakauppa:maa#kauppa n_11_AO ;
kuppa:kuppa n_11_A0_A2I ;
kolmenhuonheentupa:kolmenhuonheen#tupa n_11_A0_A2I ;
syömätupa:syömä#tupa n_11_A0_A2I ;
hera:hera n_11_AO ;
irtokoira:irto#koira n_11_A0_A2I ;
puora:puora n_11_A0_A2I ;
kaisa:kaisa n_11_AO ;
hoksa:hoksa n_11_A0_A2I ;
sisäosa:sisä#osa n_11_A0_A2I ;
paivunkissa:paivun#kissa n_11_AO ;
puuklossa:puu#klossa n_11_A0_A2I ;
työpaita:työ#paita n_11_AO ;
lapsikulta:lapsi#kulta n_11_A0_A2I ;
hietaranta:hieta#ranta n_11_AO ;
uskontokunta:uskonto#kunta n_11_A0_A2I ;
loota:loota n_11_A0_A2I ;
pasta:pasta n_11_AO ;
plaatta:plaatta n_11_AO ;
luotta:luotta n_11_A0_A2I ;
ampumahauta:ampuma#hauta n_11_AO ;
mettätieva:mettä#tieva n_11_AO ;
miljööloova:miljöö#loova n_11_A0_A2I ;
sauva:sauva n_11_AO ;
illustrasuunikuva:illustrasuuni#kuva n_11_A0_A2I ;
kromikruuva:kromi#kruuva n_11_A0_A2I ;
ketunrauđat:ketun#rauta n_11_AO_pl ;
varat:vara n_11_AO_pl ;
kvääniflaku:kvääni#fla n_11_dial ;
viiriflaku:viiri#fla n_11_dial ;
flaku:fla n_11_dial ;
